Alabama, session 2026rs, SB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 36-25-15, Code of Alabama 1975, as
last amended by Act 2025-282 of the 2025 Regular Session, is
amended to read as follows:
"§36-25-15
(a) Candidates at every level of government shall file
a completed statement of economic interests for the previous
calendar year with the State Ethics Commission: (i) not more
than five days after the deadline to file a declaration of
candidacy as provided in Section 17-13-5, or in the case of an
independent candidate, not more than five days after the date
of the first primary election; or (ii) for a candidate for
municipal office, not more than five days after the deadline
for the candidate to file his or her qualifying papers with
the appropriate election official. Nothing in this section
shall be deemed to require a second filing of the individual's
statement of economic interests if a current statement of
economic interests is on file with the commission. If a
candidate has already filed a current statement of economic
interests for a reason other than his or her candidacy, the
candidate, by the deadline provided by this subsection, shall
Page 1

candidate, by the deadline provided by this subsection, shall
SB194 Enrolled
provide proof to the commission that a current statement has
already been submitted or file a new or amended statement.
(b) Each election official who receives a declaration
of candidacy or petition to appear on the ballot for election
from a candidate, within five days of the receipt, shall
notify the commission of the name of the candidate, as defined
in this chapter, and the date on which the individual became a
candidate. The commission, within five business days of the
filing deadline described in subsection (a), shall notify the
election official whether the candidate has complied with this
section. If the commission's notification indicates the
candidate has not complied with this section, the election
official shall immediately notify the candidate, and the
candidate shall have five additional days to provide evidence
to the election official that the candidate has filed a
statement of economic interests in compliance with this
section.
(c) Other provisions of the law notwithstanding, if a
candidate does not submit a statement of economic interests or
when applicable, an amended statement of economic interests in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter, the name of
the individual shall not appear on the ballot and the
candidate shall be deemed not qualified as a candidate in that
election. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the commission, for
good cause shown, may allow the candidate an additional five
days to file the statement of economic interests. If a
candidate is deemed not qualified, the appropriate election
official shall remove the name of the candidate from the
Page 2

official shall remove the name of the candidate from the
SB194 Enrolled
ballot."
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 3

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB194 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB194
Senate 12-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Givhan
Page 4